Utah statutes.
20A-3-203.   Officer or watcher revealing vote.

(1)  It is unlawful for any election official or watcher to reveal to any other person the name of any candidate for whom a voter has voted or to communicate to another his opinion, belief, or impression as to how or for whom a voter has voted.

(2)  Any person who violates this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

